Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Selected Industrial Feasibility Law

§ 57-11-61.
Short title.

Sections 57-11-61 through 57-11-69 may be cited as “The Selected Industrial Feasibility Law of 1964.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8939-21; Laws, 1964, ch. 218, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 24, 1964).

§ 57-11-63.
Preparation of marketing, operating and financial feasibility studies of selected heavy industries.

The Mississippi Agricultural and Industrial Board is hereby authorized and empowered to contract with a firm or firms which are experienced, competent and qualified to make market, operating and financial feasibility studies as may be necessary to accomplish the following:

To make specific marketing, operating and financial feasibility studies of selected heavy industries in the chemical, petrochemical, mineral, wood and pulp-using, and related fields that can properly be constructed and operated in the State of Mississippi to preempt markets that now exist or may exist.

To contract with the firm or firms making such feasibility studies on the basis that they will recommend methods which will promptly cause to be constructed and/or operated, such manufacturing and industrial facilities, or either, as may prove by these studies to be feasible.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8939-22; Laws, 1964, ch. 218, § 2; Laws, 1966, ch. 236, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved June 16, 1966).

§ 57-11-65.
Contracts and expenditures for feasibility studies; contributions.

The Mississippi Agricultural and Industrial Board is authorized and empowered to contract and pay for the feasibility studies as set out in Section 57-11-63, in such amount or amounts as may be necessary to attain the objectives of Sections 57-11-61 through 57-11-69, provided such commitments and expenditures do not at any time exceed the amount or balance that may be available in a special “selected industrial feasibility fund” maintained in the state treasury through such appropriation as may be subsequently made by the legislature for such purpose, or as received from contributions and funds from various political subdivisions, and area industrial development districts or organizations.

Cities, towns, municipalities, boards of supervisors, and any and all combinations thereof, and area industrial development districts or organizations, are hereby authorized, in the discretion of said political subdivisions and area industrial development districts and organizations, to make contributions to the Mississippi Agricultural and Industrial Board, such funds as said political subdivisions are authorized to use for advertising and industrial promotion purposes, to be deposited into the “selected industrial feasibility fund,” and which contributions will be used by the Mississippi Agricultural and Industrial Board for the purposes of making the hereinabove designated feasibility studies, and said studies shall be made available to said contributing political subdivisions, and area industrial development districts or organizations.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8939-23; Laws, 1964, ch. 218, § 3; Laws, 1966, ch. 236, §§ 2, 3, eff from and after passage (approved June 16, 1966).

§ 57-11-67.
Progress reports; termination of study.

The firm or firms which are under contract to make such feasibility studies shall submit progress reports to the Mississippi Agricultural and Industrial Board on each stage of the study, and should any stage of the progress report reflect that the stage or feasibility study shall not be feasible, then the entire study shall be terminated.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8939-24; Laws, 1964, ch. 218, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved March 24, 1964).

§ 57-11-69.
Selected industrial feasibility fund.

There shall be a “selected industrial feasibility fund,” which fund shall be maintained in the state treasury as a separate fund. The Mississippi Agricultural and Industrial Board is authorized to receive appropriated funds from the legislature of the State of Mississippi and contributions and funds from the different political subdivisions of this state and area industrial development districts or organizations, and shall deposit all of said funds and contributions into this “selected industrial feasibility fund,” and said Mississippi Agricultural and Industrial Board shall, in the manner now required by law, expend from said fund such sums of money necessary for the payment of feasibility studies required in connection with the provisions of Sections 57-11-61 through 57-11-69, so long as there is a balance in the said fund.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8939-25; Laws, 1964, ch. 218, § 5; Laws, 1966, ch. 236, §§ 4, 5, eff from and after passage (approved June 16, 1966).